Hawaii statutes.
[§183D-27.5] Harassment of hunters;
prohibition. (a) No person shall intentionally prevent or attempt to
prevent the lawful taking of game by a person licensed pursuant to section
183D-21 by:

(1) Placing the person's self in a location in which
human presence may affect the behavior of game to be taken or the feasibility
of taking such game;

(2) Creating a visual, aural, olfactory, or physical
stimulus to affect the behavior of game to be taken;

(3) Affecting the condition or placement of personal
property intended for use in the taking; or

(4) Obstructing the person's access to areas in which
the person intends to lawfully take game.

(b) No person shall enter or remain upon
public lands or waters, or upon private lands or waters, without permission of
the owner or the owner's agent, with intent to violate this section.

(c) The maximum penalty for violation of
subsection (a) or (b) is a fine of $500, thirty days imprisonment, or both. [L
1995, c 186, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next